Louisiana, session 2026, SB211.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1460(B)(2)(i) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1460. Fire insurance rates; the Property Insurance Association of Louisiana
* * *
B.(1) * * *
(2) The board of directors of the association shall consist of nineteen twenty
members, as follows:
* * *
(i) One member Two members shall be a representative representatives
designated by the Louisiana Fire Chiefs Association.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-492 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 211